Washington statutes.
RCW 42.12.030

Term of person elected to fill vacancy.

Whenever any officer resigns his or her office before the expiration of his or her term, or the office becomes vacant from any other cause, and at a subsequent special election such vacancy is filled, the person so elected to fill such vacancy shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

[ 2012 c 117 s 105; 1981 c 180 s 5; Code 1881 s 3066; 1866 p 30 s 6; RRS s 9951.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 180: See note following RCW 42.12.040.